Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-106
Boone.

The county of Boone is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township eighteen, north, of range eight, west; thence east along the northern boundary of the Pawnee reservation, to a point where the dividing line between ranges four and five, west, intersect the same; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-two, north, of range five, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-two, north, of range eight, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 4, p. 213;

R.S.1913, § 818;

C.S.1922, § 720;

C.S.1929, § 25-107;

R.S.1943, § 22-106.